matxin-eng-eus.verb_transfer.foma
!define TransAspOsatu [  		     		     		     		     
regex [
             [  "PART"   -> "[ADI][SIN]+[AMM][PART]" ]				     #!!#
       .o.								     
       [  "ADOIN"  -> "[ADI][SIN]+[AMM][ADOIN]" ]				     #!!#
       .o.								     
       [  "EZBU"   -> "[ADI][SIN]+[AMM][ADOIN]+[ASP][EZBU]" ] 		     #!!#
       .o.								    
       [  "BURU"   -> "[ADI][SIN]+[AMM][PART]+[ASP][BURU]" ]		     #!!#
       .o.								    
       [  "GERO"   -> "[ADI][SIN]+[AMM][PART]+[ASP][GERO]" ]		     #!!#
       .o.								    
       [  "ADPGER" -> "[ADI][SIN]+[AMM][PART]+[ASP][GERO]" ]		     #!!#
       .o.								    
       [  "MOD"    -> "[ADI][SIN]+[AMM][PART]+[ERL][MEN][MOD]" ]		     #!!#
       .o.								    
       [  "ADIZE"  -> "[ADI][SIN]+[AMM][ADIZE]" ]				     #!!#
       .o.								    
       [  "HUR"    -> "[ADI][SIN]+[AMM][ADOIN]+[ASP][EZBU][HUR]" ]	     #!!#
       .o.								    
       [  "ALA"    -> "[ADI][SIN]+[AMM][ADIZE]+[DEK][ALA]" ]		     #!!#
       .o.								    
       [  "DAT"    -> "[ADI][SIN]+[AMM][ADIZE]+[DEK][DAT][NUMS]" ]	     #!!#
       .o.								    
       [  "INE"    -> "[ADI][SIN]+[AMM][ADIZE]+[DEK][INE]" ]		     #!!#
       .o.								    
       [  "IZE"    -> "[IZE][ARR]"  ||                        "<PER>" _ ?* ]					     #!!#
];


!define ukanIzan [
regex [
      		      [ "ukan" -> "izan" || ?* _ XXX ?* "<""NAG"">""[""ADI""]""[""SIN""]" ?* ]
		      .o.
		      [ "ukan" -> "izan" || ?* _ XXX ?* "<""NAG"">""[""ADI""]""[""SIN""]" ?* ]

];


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
echo >> Irteera garbitzeko;

!define TransIrteera1 [
regex [
      		      [ "#" ?* "&" ?* "&" -> "" ]
		      .o.
		      [ XXX  ?* ")"		 -> "" ]
		    ];	

!define TransIrteera2 [
regex [
      		      [ "$"			-> ""	]
		      .o.
		      [ "#"			-> ""	]
		    ];

!##define TransIrteera [TransIrteera1 .o. TransIrteera2 ];




!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

echo 
echo >> + Automata guztiak .fst bakar bateank gorde
echo >> + Save all transucer of the stack in one .fst fils
echo >> ======================================== ; 


save stack ./eng-eus.verb_transfer.fst

echo  >> Bukatu du
echo  >> Finish
echo >> ======================================== ; 
